src/fst/affixes/propernouns.lexc
!! Proper noun inflection
!! Khanty

LEXICON ACRONDELIMITER ! Here we need some kind of vowel harmony
    PROP ;
:%: PROP ;
:%- PROP ;
:%' PROP ;

LEXICON Prop-kev
+N+Prop: NOUN ;

LEXICON PROP
+N+Prop: NOUN ;


! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:
